New Jersey, session 221, S3944.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   Section 1 of P.L.1985, c.151 (C.33:1-19.7) is amended to read as follows: 1.   The governing board or body of any municipality, upon the approval of the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, may issue a plenary retail consumption license to a nonprofit corporation exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code , including a disregarded entity of the corporation that is a single-member limited liability corporation disregarded for federal income tax purposes pursuant to 26 C.F.R. Part 301, which regularly operates as an art-house movie theater or conducts musical 4[or theatrical]4 performances 4[or] , theatrical productions,4 concerts 4, or other public entertainment events4 for which admission is charged.  2[1The governing board or body of any municipality, upon the approval of the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, also may issue a plenary retail consumption license to a municipality or county for use in connection with a premises which regularly operates as an art-house movie theater or conducts musical or theatrical performances or concerts for which admission is charged.1]2 A license issued pursuant to this section shall be used in connection with 4[a]4 premises 4[with] that have4 a seating capacity of 4at least4 1,000 persons 4[or more that is] and are4 primarily used to 4[conduct musical or theatrical performances or concerts] host musical performances, theatrical productions, concerts, or other public entertainment events4. The license shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages by the nonprofit corporation or its restaurant operator 2[1[who] or a county or municipality which1] who2 has been approved pursuant to procedures established by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control for consumption on the licensed premises: a.   during the two hours immediately preceding performances 4or public entertainment events4; b.   during performances 4or public entertainment events4, including intermission; and c.   during the two hours immediately following performances 4or public entertainment events4. For the purposes of this section [,] : 4[2Performance shall include the showing of any motion picture, musical concert, theatrical play, dance recital, literature reading or other artistic or cultural exhibition.2 "Licensed premises" shall include the premises where the]4 2[musical or theatrical]2 4[performance]4 2[or concert]2 4[is held and any adjacent premises]4 2[owned and]2 4[operated by the licensee.]4 "Art-house movie theater" means a theater that is principally used for the purpose of showing motion pictures and is operated by a nonprofit arts organization 2[1or a county or municipality1 ,]2 which demonstrates a commitment to enriching its local community by providing opportunities for participation in the arts, offering arts education opportunities, and promoting regional economic prosperity. 4"Licensed premises" shall include the premises where the performance or public entertainment event is held and any adjacent premises operated by the licensee. "Performance" shall include the showing of any motion picture, musical concert, theatrical play, dance recital, literature reading, or other artistic or cultural exhibition. "Public entertainment event" shall include a sporting event, a simulcast, or other social, charitable, or athletic event.4 A license issued under the provisions of this section shall not be counted in determining the number of licenses under P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.13 et seq.) or under P.L.1968, c.277 (C.40:48-2.40 et seq.). 4At the option of the nonprofit licensee, revenue generated by a concessionaire within or adjacent to the licensed premises may be used to support or subsidize the theaters performances or public entertainment events held at the licensed premises. For the purposes of this section, the division shall not differentiate for the purposes of approving a nonprofit applicant operating in a publicly-owned or nonprofit arts organization-owned theater or art-house movie theater or performing arts center.4 (cf: P.L.2023, c.104, s.1) 2.   Section 2 of P.L.2019, c.466 (C.33:1-19.8) is amended to read as follows: 2.   The governing board or body of any municipality, upon the approval of the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, may issue a plenary retail consumption license to a nonprofit corporation exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code , including a disregarded entity of the corporation that is a single-member limited liability corporation disregarded for federal income tax purposes pursuant to 26 C.F.R. Part 301, which regularly operates as an art-house movie theater or conducts musical 4[or theatrical]4 performances 4[or] , theatrical productions,4 concerts 4, or other public entertainment events4 for which admission is charged.  2[1The governing board or body of any municipality, upon the approval of the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, also may issue a plenary retail consumption license to a municipality or county for use in connection with a premises which regularly operates as an art-house movie theater or conducts musical or theatrical performances or concerts for which admission is charged.1]2 A license issued pursuant to this section shall be used in connection with a premises with a seating capacity of 50 persons or more but less than 1,000 persons that is primarily used to 4[conduct musical or theatrical performances or concerts] host musical performances, theatrical productions, concerts, or other public entertainment events4. The license shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages by the nonprofit corporation or its restaurant operator 2[1[who] or a county or municipality which1] who2 has been approved pursuant to procedures established by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control for consumption on the licensed premises: a.     during the two hours immediately preceding performances 4or public entertainment events4; b.    during performances 4or public entertainment events4, including intermission; and c.     for not more than 15 performances in a calendar year, during the two hours immediately following performances 4or public entertainment events4. For the purposes of this section [, ] : 4[2Performance shall include the showing of any motion picture, musical concert, theatrical play, dance recital, literature reading or other artistic or cultural exhibition.2 "Licensed premises" shall include the premises where the]4 2[musical or theatrical]2 4[performance]4 2[or concert]2 4[is held and any adjacent premises]4 2[owned and]2 4[operated by the licensee.]4 "Art-house movie theater" means a theater that is principally used for the purpose of showing motion pictures and is operated by a nonprofit arts organization 2[1or a county or municipality ,]2 which demonstrates a commitment to enriching its local community by providing opportunities for participation in the arts, offering arts education opportunities, and promoting regional economic prosperity. 4"Licensed premises" shall include the premises where the performance or public entertainment event is held and any adjacent premises operated by the licensee. "Performance" shall include the showing of any motion picture, musical concert, theatrical play, dance recital, literature reading, or other artistic or cultural exhibition. "Public entertainment event" shall include a sporting event, a simulcast, or other social, charitable, or athletic event.4 A license issued under the provisions of this section shall not be counted in determining the number of licenses under P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.13 et seq.) or under P.L.1968, c.277 (C.40:48-2.40 et seq.). 4At the option of the nonprofit licensee, revenue generated by a concessionaire within or adjacent to the licensed premises may be used to support or subsidize the theaters performances or public entertainment events held at the licensed premises. For the purposes of this section, the division shall not differentiate for the purposes of approving a nonprofit applicant operating in a publicly-owned or nonprofit arts organization-owned theater or art-house movie theater or performing arts center.4 (cf: P.L.2023, c.104, s.2) 2[13.          a.  As used in this section, licensed premises means a private theater entity used for the purpose of showing motion pictures or where concerts or musical or theatrical performances are held and any adjacent premises owned and operated by the licensee. b.   It shall be lawful for the governing board or body of a municipality, upon the approval of the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, to issue a plenary retail consumption license for use in connection with a licensed premises as defined in subsection a. of this section that was incorporated on or prior to the effective date of this act. The plenary retail consumption license shall allow a private entity, including a corporation, or its restaurant operator which has been approved pursuant to procedures established by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises during the one hour immediately preceding a motion picture, concert, or musical or theatrical performance and during performances, including intermission. A plenary retail consumption license only shall be issued pursuant to this section for use in connection with a premises on which: (1) the space or spaces within the premises that are used for musical, theatrical, or concert performances have a total seating capacity of at least 50 persons but not more than 1,000 persons; (2) the space or spaces within the premises that are used for showing motion pictures have three or less movie screens and a total seating capacity of at least 50 persons but not more than 600 persons. c.     A license issued under the provisions of this section shall not be counted in determining the number of licenses under P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.13 et seq.) or under P.L.1968, c.277 (C.40:48-2.40 et seq.).1]2 23.  a.  The governing board or body of any municipality, upon the approval of the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, may issue a plenary retail consumption license to an eligible business entity operating as a community theater for which admission is charged, and for which the premises meet the standards required in subsection b. of this section. b. A license issued pursuant to this section shall be used only in connection with a premises in which: (1) the space or spaces within the premises that are used for showing performances of musical concerts, theatrical plays, dance recitals, literature readings 4,4 or other artistic or cultural exhibitions contain one or more stages with viewer seating areas having a total seating capacity of at least 50 persons but not more than 1,000 persons and do not contain any movie screens for showing performances of motion pictures; or (2) the space or spaces within the premises that are used for showing performances of motion pictures contain no more than 3[three] five3 movie screens with viewer seating areas having a total seating capacity of at least 50 persons but not more than 600 persons; or (3) the space or spaces within the premises that are used for showing performances have a total seating capacity of at least 50 persons but not more than 1,500 persons, contain at least one but not more than 3[three] five3 movie screens for showing motion pictures, and contain at least one stage for showing musical concerts, theatrical plays, dance recitals, literature readings or other artistic or cultural exhibitions. The seating capacity of the viewer seating areas located in the space or spaces with a stage or stages shall constitute at least 25 4[%] percent4 of the total seating capacity. c. The license shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages by the eligible business entity who has been approved pursuant to procedures established by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control for consumption on the licensed premises only during the one hour immediately preceding a performance and during performances, including intermission. d. For the purposes of this section: 4["Performance" shall include the showing of any motion picture, musical concert, theatrical play, dance recital, literature reading or other artistic or cultural exhibition. "Licensed premises" shall include the premises where the performance is held and any adjacent premises operated by the licensee. "Eligible business entity" shall include any corporation, company, partnership, sole proprietorship or person, including any person or entity owning 10% or more of the shares thereof, that: (1) is not listed or traded on a stock exchange; and (2) is not owned, or partially owned, by a corporation or other entity listed or traded on a stock exchange; and (3) does not own, or partially own, any other plenary retail consumption license issued by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control; and (4) does not include as a shareholder a person or entity that owns 10% or more of the shares of the eligible business entity and that owns, or partially owns, any other plenary retail consumption license issued by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control.]4 "Community theater" shall mean a theater that is used for the purpose of showing performances of motion pictures, musical concerts, theatrical plays, dance recitals, literature readings or other artistic or cultural exhibitions and is owned and operated by an eligible business entity. 4"Eligible business entity" shall include any corporation, company, partnership, sole proprietorship or person, including any person or entity owning 10 percent or more of the shares thereof, that: (1) is not listed or traded on a stock exchange; (2) is not owned, or partially owned, by a corporation or other entity listed or traded on a stock exchange; (3) does not own, or partially own, any other plenary retail consumption license issued by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control; and (4) does not include as a shareholder a person or entity that owns 10 percent or more of the shares of the eligible business entity and that owns, or partially owns, any other plenary retail consumption license issued by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control. "Licensed premises" shall include the premises where the performance is held and any adjacent premises operated by the licensee. "Performance" shall include the showing of any motion picture, musical concert, theatrical play, dance recital, literature reading or other artistic or cultural exhibition.4 e. A license issued under the provisions of this section shall not be counted in determining the number of licenses under P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.13 et seq.) or under P.L.1968, c.277 (C.40:48-2.40 et seq.).2 1[3.]  4.1  This act shall take effect immediately.